Utah statutes.
63H-3-107.   Authority -- Powers.

(1) (a)  The authority shall create, operate, and maintain a center that promotes the purposes described in Section 63H-3-102.

(b)  The center shall:

(i)  have an extensive outreach program that serves all regions of the state; and

(ii)  collaborate and coordinate with education, arts, technology, and engineering entities, including schools and industries.

(2)  The authority has perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate and may:

(a)  adopt, amend, and repeal rules, policies, and procedures for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

(b)  sue and be sued in its own name;

(c)  maintain an office at a place within this state it designates;

(d)  adopt, amend, and repeal bylaws and rules, not inconsistent with this chapter, to carry into effect the powers and purposes of the authority and the conduct of its business;

(e)  purchase, lease, sell, and otherwise dispose of property and rights-of-way;

(f)  employ experts, advisory groups, and other professionals it considers necessary;

(g)  employ and retain independent legal counsel;

(h)  make and execute contracts and all other instruments necessary or convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its duties under this chapter to create, operate, and maintain a Science Center in Utah;

(i)  procure insurance for liability and against any loss in connection with its property and other assets in amounts and from insurers it considers desirable;

(j)  borrow money, receive appropriations from the Legislature, and receive other public money and accept aid or contributions from any source of money, property, labor, or other things of value to be held, used, and applied to carry out the purposes of this chapter subject to the conditions upon which the grants and contributions are made, including gifts or grants from any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States or of this state for any purpose consistent with this chapter;

(k)  enter into agreements with any department, agency, or instrumentality or political subdivision of the United States or this state for the purpose of providing for the creation, operation, and maintenance of a Science Center in Utah; and

(l)  to do any act necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted by this chapter.

(3) (a)  All money received by the authority under Subsection (2)(j) and from any other source is for the exclusive use of the authority to create, operate, maintain, improve, and provide for a Science Center in Utah.

(b)  The money received by the authority may not be used for any other purpose or by any other entity.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 370, 2011 General Session

